Florida, session 2026, HB1435.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
36
37 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of section
38 20.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
39 20.04 Structure of executive branch.—The executive branch
40 of state government is structured as follows:
41 (7)
42 (b) Within the limitations of this subsection, the head of
43 the department may recommend the establishment of additional
44 divisions, offices, bureaus, sections, and subsections of the
45 department to promote efficient and effective operation of the
46 department. However, such additional divisions, or offices,
47 bureaus, sections, and subsections in the Department of Children
48 and Families, the Department of Corrections, the Department of
49 Commerce, and the Department of Transportation, may be
50 established only by specific statutory enactment. New bureaus,
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
51 sections, and subsections of departments may be initiated by a
52 department and established as recommended by the Department of
53 Management Services and approved by the Executive Office of the
54 Governor, or may be established by specific statutory enactment.
55 Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 20.165, Florida
56 Statutes, is amended to read:
57 20.165 Department of Business and Professional
58 Regulation.—There is created a Department of Business and
59 Professional Regulation.
60 (3) The secretary shall appoint a director for each
61 division established within this section. Each division director
62 shall directly administer the division and shall be responsible
63 to the secretary. The secretary may appoint deputy and assistant
64 secretaries, subject to review and approval by the Legislature,
65 as necessary to aid the secretary in fulfilling the secretary's
66 statutory obligations.
67 Section 3. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
68 20.23, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
69 20.23 Department of Transportation.—There is created a
70 Department of Transportation which shall be a decentralized
71 agency.
72 (4)
73 (b) The secretary may appoint positions at the level of
74 deputy assistant secretary or director, subject to review and
75 approval by the Legislature, which the secretary deems necessary
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
76 to accomplish the mission and goals of the department,
77 including, but not limited to, the areas of program
78 responsibility provided in this paragraph, each of whom shall be
79 appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the secretary. The
80 secretary may combine, separate, or delete offices, subject to
81 review and approval by the Legislature, as needed in
82 consultation with the Executive Office of the Governor. The
83 department's areas of program responsibility include, but are
84 not limited to, all of the following:
85 1. Administration.
86 2. Planning.
87 3. Supply chain and modal development.
88 4. Design.
89 5. Highway operations.
90 6. Right-of-way.
91 7. Toll operations.
92 8. Transportation technology.
93 9. Information technology.
94 10. Motor carrier weight inspection.
95 11. Work program and budget.
96 12. Comptroller.
97 13. Construction.
98 14. Statewide corridors.
99 15. Maintenance.
100 16. Forecasting and performance.
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
101 17. Emergency management.
102 18. Safety.
103 19. Materials.
104 20. Infrastructure and innovation.
105 21. Permitting.
106 22. Traffic operations.
107 23. Operational technology.
108 Section 4. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
109 20.315, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
110 20.315 Department of Corrections.—There is created a
111 Department of Corrections.
112 (3) SECRETARY OF CORRECTIONS.—The head of the Department
113 of Corrections is the Secretary of Corrections. The secretary is
114 appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the
115 Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The
116 secretary is responsible for planning, coordinating, and
117 managing the corrections system of the state. The secretary
118 shall ensure that the programs and services of the department
119 are administered in accordance with state and federal laws,
120 rules, and regulations, with established program standards, and
121 consistent with legislative intent. The secretary shall identify
122 the need for and recommend funding for the secure and efficient
123 operation of the state correctional system.
124 (c) The secretary may appoint assistant secretaries,
125 directors, or other such persons that he or she deems are
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
126 necessary, subject to review and approval by the Legislature, to
127 accomplish the mission and goals of the department, including,
128 but not limited to, the following areas of program
129 responsibility:
130 1. Security and institutional operations, which shall
131 provide inmate work programs, offender programs, security
132 administration, emergency operations response, and operational
133 oversight of the regions.
134 2. Health services, which shall be headed by a physician
135 licensed under chapter 458 or an osteopathic physician licensed
136 under chapter 459, or a professionally trained health care
137 administrator with progressively responsible experience in
138 health care administration. This individual shall be responsible
139 for the delivery of health services to offenders within the
140 system and shall have direct professional authority over such
141 services.
142 3. Community corrections, which shall provide for
143 coordination of community alternatives to incarceration and
144 operational oversight of community corrections regions.
145 4. Administrative services, which shall provide budget and
146 accounting services within the department, including the
147 construction and maintenance of correctional institutions, human
148 resource management, research, planning and evaluation, and
149 technology.
150 5. Program, transition, and postrelease services, which
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
151 shall provide for the direct management and supervision of all
152 departmental programs, including the coordination and delivery
153 of education and job training to the offenders in the custody of
154 the department. In addition, this program shall provide for the
155 direct management and supervision of all programs that furnish
156 transition assistance to inmates who are or have recently been
157 in the custody of the department, including the coordination,
158 facilitation, and contract management of prerelease and
159 postrelease transition services provided by governmental and
160 private providers, including faith-based service groups.
161 Section 5. Subsection (2) of section 20.316, Florida
162 Statutes, is amended to read:
163 20.316 Department of Juvenile Justice.—There is created a
164 Department of Juvenile Justice.
165 (2) DEPARTMENT PROGRAMS.—The following programs are
166 established within the Department of Juvenile Justice:
167 (a) Accountability and Program Support.
168 (b) Administration.
169 (c) Intake and Detention.
170 (d) Prevention Services.
171 (e) Probation and Community Corrections.
172 (f) Residential and Correctional Facilities.
173
174 The secretary may establish assistant secretary positions and a
175 chief of staff position, subject to review and approval by the
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
176 Legislature, as necessary to administer the requirements of this
177 section.
178 Section 6. Subsection (1) of section 20.41, Florida
179 Statutes, is amended to read:
180 20.41 Department of Elderly Affairs.—There is created a
181 Department of Elderly Affairs.
182 (1) The head of the department is the Secretary of Elderly
183 Affairs. The secretary must be appointed by the Governor,
184 subject to confirmation by the Senate. The secretary serves at
185 the pleasure of the Governor. The secretary shall administer the
186 affairs of the department and may employ assistants,
187 professional staff, and other employees, subject to review and
188 approval by the Legislature, as necessary to discharge the
189 powers and duties of the department.
190 Section 7. Subsection (9) of section 20.43, Florida
191 Statutes, is amended to read:
192 20.43 Department of Health.—There is created a Department
193 of Health.
194 (9) There is established within the Department of Health
195 the Office of Minority Health and Health Equity, which shall be
196 headed by a Senior Health Equity Officer. The Senior Health
197 Equity Officer shall administer the Closing the Gap grant
198 program established under ss. 381.7351-381.7356 in a manner that
199 maximizes the impact of the grants in achieving health equity.
200 The Senior Health Equity Officer shall evaluate the awarded
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
201 grants to assess the effectiveness and efficiency of the use of
202 funds and to determine best practices. The Senior Health Equity
203 Officer shall disseminate information on best practices to
204 stakeholders and shall ensure that the assessments inform future
205 grant award decisions.
206 Section 8. Subsection (2) of section 20.60, Florida
207 Statutes, is amended to read:
208 20.60 Department of Commerce; creation; powers and
209 duties.—
210 (2) The head of the department is the Secretary of
211 Commerce, who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to
212 confirmation by the Senate. The secretary shall serve at the
213 pleasure of and report to the Governor and shall serve as the
214 Governor's chief negotiator for business recruitment and
215 expansion and economic development. The secretary may appoint
216 deputy and assistant secretaries, subject to review and approval
217 by the Legislature, as necessary to aid the secretary in
218 fulfilling his or her statutory obligations.
219 Section 9. The Legislature shall, by the adjournment of
220 the 2027 Regular Session, review the purposes and functions of
221 every department division, office, bureau, section, and
222 subsection and dissolve any such division, office, bureau,
223 section, and subsection as it deems necessary.
224 Section 10. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
225 282.0051, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
226 282.0051 Department of Management Services; Florida
227 Digital Service; powers, duties, and functions.—
228 (2)(a) The Secretary of Management Services shall
229 designate a state chief information officer, who shall
230 administer the Florida Digital Service. The state chief
231 information officer, prior to appointment, must have at least 5
232 years of experience in the development of information system
233 strategic planning and development or information technology
234 policy, and, preferably, have leadership-level experience in the
235 design, development, and deployment of interoperable software
236 and data solutions. The state chief information officer shall
237 have all decisionmaking authority with respect to information
238 technology on behalf of all departments and all department
239 divisions, offices, bureaus, sections, and subsections.
240 Section 11. Section 381.735, Florida Statutes, is
241 repealed.
242 Section 12. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 381.814,
243 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
244 381.814 Sickle Cell Disease Research and Treatment Grant
245 Program.—The Sickle Cell Disease Research and Treatment Grant
246 Program is created within the Department of Health.
247 (3) Funds appropriated to the program shall be awarded by
248 the Department of Health Office of Minority Health and Health
249 Equity, within the department, to community-based sickle cell
250 disease medical treatment and research centers operating in this
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
251 state.
252 (4) The Department of Health Office of Minority Health and
253 Health Equity shall award grants under the program to community-
254 based sickle cell disease medical treatment and research centers
255 to fund projects specific to sickle cell disease in the
256 following project areas:
257 (a) Sickle cell disease workforce development and
258 education.—Such projects shall include, but need not be limited
259 to, facility-based education programs, continuing education
260 curriculum development, and outreach and education activities
261 with the local health care practitioner community. Workforce
262 development and education projects must be based on current
263 evidence-based clinical practice guidelines for sickle cell
264 disease.
265 (b) Sickle Cell Disease Treatment Centers of Excellence.—
266 Such projects shall include, but need not be limited to,
267 operational support for existing centers of excellence, facility
268 enhancement of existing centers of excellence, and the
269 establishment of new centers of excellence.
270 Section 13. Subsection (6) of section 383.2163, Florida
271 Statutes, is amended to read:
272 383.2163 Telehealth Minority Maternity Care Program.—The
273 department shall establish a statewide Telehealth Minority
274 Maternity Care Program that uses telehealth to expand the
275 capacity for positive maternal health outcomes in racial and
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
276 ethnic minority populations. The department may enlist county
277 health departments to assist with program implementation.
278 (6) FUNDING.—The department's Division of Community Health
279 Promotion and Office of Minority Health and Health Equity shall
280 work in partnership to apply for federal funds that are
281 available to assist the department in accomplishing the
282 program's purpose and successfully implementing the program.
283 Section 14. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
284 409.91235, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
285 409.91235 Agency review and report on medications,
286 treatments, and services for sickle cell disease.—
287 (1) The Agency for Health Care Administration, in
288 consultation with the Florida Medical Schools Quality Network
289 and a dedicated sickle cell disease medical treatment and
290 research center that maintains a sickle cell patient database
291 and tracks sickle cell disease outcome measures, shall, every 2
292 years:
293 (b)1. Develop a written report that details the review
294 findings.
295 2. Beginning November 1, 2024, and by November 1 of every
296 other year thereafter, post the report on the agency's website.
297 3. Submit a copy of the report to the Governor, the
298 President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
299 Representatives, the Department of Health Health's Office of
300 Minority Health and Health Equity, and the Rare Disease Advisory
Page 12 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1435 2026
301 Council.
302 Section 15. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 13 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1435-00